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DIB2Y-04

Fuel Pump Control Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Refer to DTC P0230 on page DI-125.
WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0230 on page DI-125.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
When using hand-held tester:

1 Check fuel pump operation (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-7).

OK> Go to step 8.
NG \

2 [ Connect hand-held tester, and check operation of fuel pump relay.

PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.
(c) Enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / ACTIVE TEST / FUEL PUMP / SPD.
CHECK:
Check the operation of the fuel pump relay when it is switched ON and OFF by the hand-held tester.
OK:
Operating noise can be heard from the relay.

OK> Go to step 4.
NG \

3 Checkoperation of fuel pumprelay (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI -54).

NG> Replace fuel pump relay.
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4 [ Check fuel pump (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-7).

@

5 | Check circuit opening relay (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-53).

@

6 | Check for open in harness and connector between EFI or ECD relay and fuel
pump, and fuel pump and body ground (See page IN-20).

NG> Repair or replace fuel pump.

NG> Replace circuit opening relay.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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7 | Check voltage between terminal FC and E1 of engine control ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal FC of the engine control
ECU connector and body ground.
OK:
Voltage: 9to 14V

EE
—

Engine Control ECU
P Atos21 Connector A19629 NG> Check for open in harness and connector be-

tween battery and FC terminal of engine control
OK \

ECU (See page IN-20).
Proceed to problem symptoms table
(See page DI-34).

8 Checkfuel pumpresistor (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI -59).

@

Check for open in harness and connector between circuit opening relay and fuel pump resistor,
and fuel pump resistor and fuel pump (See page IN-20).

NG> Replace fuel pump resistor.
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When not using hand-held tester:

1 Check operation of fuel pump (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-7).

0K> Go to step 7.

NG

G

2 [ Check operation of fuel pump relay (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-54).

NG> Replace fuel pump relay.

G

3 | Check fuel pump (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-7).

NG> Repair or replace fuel pump.

G

4 | Check circuit opening relay (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-53).

NG> Replace circuit opening relay.

OK

G

5 | Check for open in harness and connector between EFI or ECD relay and fuel
pump, and fuel pump and body ground (See page IN-20).
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NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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6 [ Check voltage between terminal FC of engine control ECU connector and body
ground.
PREPARATION:
FC (+) Turn the ignition switch ON.
ED CHECK:

T - [ S Measure the voltage between terminal FC of the engine control

SEREaE ﬂj—;]m” A ECU connector and body ground
isdicdicel TR ) y ground.

N‘( Voltage: 9to 14V
Engine Control ECU

P Al9521 Connector AL9629 NG> Check for open in harness and connector be-

tween battery and FC terminal of engine control
OK \

ECU (See page IN-20).
Proceed to problem symptoms table
(See page DI-34).

Check fuel pump resistor (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-59).

@

Check for open in harness and connector between circuit opening relay and fuel pump resistor,
fuel pump resistor and fuel pump (See page IN-20).

NG> Replace fuel pump resistor.
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